Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Prevention of Accident and Health Hazards.

Administrative Code. —

For building safety regulations, see 8 AAC 75.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This article applies equally to agencies of state government and to private sector employers.
March 27, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] has sufficient authority under Alaska law to administer and enforce safety and health regulations as to employment conditions on state-operated vessels which are not separately regulated by the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration, the United States Coast Guard or any other federal agency. February 16, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The state’s strong interest in providing occupational safety and health coverage for all of its employees, combined with the primarily local operation of most state ferries and vessels, provides a substantial basis for applying state laws to employment conditions on State of Alaska vessels. February 16, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

With respect to state employees working on vessels which are too small to qualify for the Coast Guard’s certification requirements, or which are otherwise exempted from Coast Guard inspections, the Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] retains jurisdiction to enforce any applicable existing safety and health standards, as may be supplemented by eventual maritime standards. February 16, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] cannot cite a partnership for a violation of the Occupational Safety and Health Act where the only exposed workers are partners of the partnership; where the facts indicate a bona fide partnership and the only exposed workers are partners who share equally in the control and operation of the partnership, there are no exposed employees under this article and the partnership is not in violation.
February 20, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Plant and Job Safety — OSHA and State Laws, § 1 et seq.

30 C.J.S., Employers’ Liability for Injuries to Employees, § 1 et seq.

What constitutes a “scaffold” within scaffold safety requirement statutes. 87 ALR2d 977.

Sec. 18.60.010.
Legislative intent.

The legislature finds that personal injuries and illnesses arising out of work situations impose a substantial burden upon, and are a hindrance to, the people of the state in terms of loss of production, wage loss, medical expenses, and disability compensation payments.

For these reasons it is found and declared necessary to undertake a program to reduce the incidence of work-related accidents and health hazards in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 109 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Cross references. —

For further provisions relating to employment practices and working conditions, see AS 23.10.

Sec. 18.60.020.
Regulations.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall issue the orders and adopt the regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

.

Upon adopting a regulation or standard, or granting any variance under this chapter, the commissioner shall include a statement of the reasons for the action, forward a copy to the OSHA Review Board, cause a copy to be published in newspapers, and submit a news release to the electronic news media in the state so as to receive statewide coverage.

History.

(§ 4 ch 109 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 148 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 276 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

For occupational safety and health review board, see 8 AAC 61, art. 3.

For variances, see 8 AAC 61, art. 5.

For consulting and training, see 8 AAC 61, art. 6.

For discrimination, see 8 AAC 61, art. 7.

For occupational safety and health standards, see 8 AAC 61, art. 11.

For building safety regulations, see 8 AAC 75.

Sec. 18.60.030.
Duties of Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall

study ways and means for prevention of accidents to persons on the streets and highways, in and on the water, in aircraft usage, in homes, on the farms, at schools, in industrial and commercial plants, and in public places;

plan and execute safety programs, including educational campaigns, designed to reduce accidents in every field of activity;

work in cooperation with official and unofficial organizations and instrumentalities in the state that are interested in the promotion of safety so that possible resources can be marshalled and utilized to reduce the menace of accidental death and injury;

work toward obtaining better observance and enforcement of laws governing street and highway traffic, and assist in bringing about, wherever feasible, the application of modern engineering measures for the prevention of traffic accidents;

confer with the public agencies responsible for safeguarding the people against accidents, and especially with the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Education and Early Development, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Health and Social Services, and the heads or representatives of federal departments and agencies operating in the state particularly concerned with safety programs and accident prevention;

establish and enforce occupational safety and health standards that prescribe requirements for safe and healthful working conditions for all employment, including state and local government employment, and the requirements are to be at least as effective as those requirements adopted by the United States Secretary of Labor under 29 U.S.C. 655 (§ 6 of P.L. 91-596);

require an employer to maintain records and submit reports to the department which records and reports are necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

and to maintain records and submit reports to the United States Secretary of Labor in the same manner and to the same extent as set out in federal law and regulations;

require an employer to maintain records and submit reports appropriate for use in developing information regarding the causes and prevention of occupational accidents and illnesses;

require an employer to make periodic inspections when necessary to carry out the record and reporting requirements of (7) and (8) of this section;

participate in occupational safety and health programs if it finds they are necessary to meet the occupational health and safety needs of the state;

execute on behalf of the state agreements or contracts necessary or desirable to enable the state to participate in occupational safety and health programs, and to receive and expend funds made available for programs of the state;

annually publish a list of toxic and hazardous substances and physical agents;

maintain a current set of OSHA form 20’s or equivalent information for toxic and hazardous substances and for physical agents, and other information relevant to toxic and hazardous substances and physical agents;

assist employers, upon request, to develop employee safety education programs and to identify and obtain information on toxic and hazardous substances and physical agents.

History.

(§ 5 ch 109 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 11 E.O. No. 39 (1977); am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For discrimination, see 8 AAC 61, art. 7.

For occupational safety and health standards, see 8 AAC 61, art. 11.

Legislative history reports. —

For adoption of letter of intent relating to ch. 93 SLA 1983, see 1983 Senate Journal, p. 1148 and 1983 House Journal, p. 1959.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] can publish its list of designated toxic and hazardous substances pursuant to paragraph (12) and
AS

18.60.105(a)

without going through the promulgation proceeding in the Administrative Procedure Act.
The list is merely a compilation of chemicals and substances from sources already identified by the legislature.
July 18, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

As the list to be published by the Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] under paragraph (12) includes those chemicals and substances described in
AS

18.60.105(a)(8)

[now (a)(9)], they are coextensive.
July 18, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.60.040.
Report.

Before the sixth day of each regular legislative session, the department shall prepare a report showing the accomplishments in this state toward reductions in accidents of all types, and recommendations for legislation, together with a plan for the proposed safety program for the succeeding year. Copies of the report shall be available for public information, and the department shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 6 ch 109 SLA 1955; am § 32 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 18.60.050.
Employment for education and enforcement purposes.
[Repealed, § 9 ch 72 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 18.60.055.
Division of labor standards and safety.

As established by AS

23.10.075

, there is in the department a division of labor standards and safety. Minimum qualifications shall be established for employees of the department acting as safety inspectors under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

.
These qualifications must include, as a minimum requirement, at least five years general work experience in the field they are assigned to inspect. Training in safety principles, codes, and standards may be substituted for work experience up to a maximum of three years.

History.

(§ 4 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 276 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 52, § 2 (1982))

Sec. 18.60.057.
Occupational Safety and Health Review Board.

There is created the Occupational Safety and Health Review Board within the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, referred to in this chapter as the OSHA Review Board. The board shall consist of three members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the legislature in joint session. One member of the board shall represent labor, one member shall represent industry, and the other shall represent the public. Each appointee must have adequate experience in the area of appointment. A member of the board may not be an employee of the state in another capacity nor may a member of the OSHA Review Board be a member or officer of another board or commission for which compensation other than per diem and travel expenses is paid.

The members of the board serve staggered terms of four years. A vacancy caused by the death, resignation, or removal of a member before the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed shall be filled only for the remainder of the unexpired term. A member of the board may be removed by the governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office.

The governor shall designate one member of the board as chairman. This member shall serve as chairman for a term of one year, but may be appointed for successive terms.

Members of the board are entitled to compensation in the amount of $50 a day for each day or portion of each day spent in actual meeting or on authorized official business incident to their duties and, in addition, they are entitled to all other transportation and per diem as provided by law for members of other state boards and commissions.

The board may employ persons, subject to legislative appropriation, it considers necessary for the purpose of performing its duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 36 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For transportation and per diem expenses for members of boards and commissions, see AS

39.20.180

.

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

For occupational safety and health review board, see 8 AAC 61, art. 3.

Sec. 18.60.058.
Reporting of employment fatalities, hospitalizations, and injuries.

In the event of an employment accident that is fatal to an employee or that results in an employee’s in-patient hospitalization, an employee’s loss of an eye, or an employee’s amputation, the employer shall report the accident. The report must be made by telephone or in person to the nearest office of the division of labor standards and safety or by telephone to the federal toll-free number provided by the division. The report must relate the name of the establishment, the location of the accident, the time of the accident, a contact person and the telephone number of the contact person, a brief description of the accident, the number of fatalities or injured employees, and the extent of any injuries. The report must be made immediately but in no event later than eight hours after receipt by the employer of information that the accident has occurred. However, if the employer first receives information of a fatality, in-patient hospitalization, loss of an eye, or amputation eight or more hours after the accident but not later than 30 days after the accident, the employer must make the report not later than eight hours after receiving the information. This subsection does not apply to an employer that first receives information of a fatality, in-patient hospitalization, loss of an eye, or amputation more than 30 days after the accident.

In the event of an employment accident that is fatal to one or more employees or that results in in-patient hospitalization of two or more employees, equipment, material, or product related to the injury or fatality may not be moved or altered until clearance is given by the department, except when compliance with this requirement would interfere for an unreasonable length of time with work or create additional hazards. If equipment, material, or products must be moved or altered before department clearance, the employer shall submit a detailed investigative report of the accident to the division.

History.

(§ 3 ch 276 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 52, § 3 (1982); am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 9, SLA 2016, see 2016 Senate Journal 1615 -- 1616.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective May 18, 2016, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “an employee” for “one or more employees” following “fatal to”; substituted “an employee's” for “the” preceding the first “in-patient hospitalization”; substituted “, an employee's loss of an eye, or an employee's amputation” for “of one or more employees” preceding “, the employer shall report”, in the second sentence, substituted “The report must be made” for “orally” at the beginning, in the third sentence, substituted “injured” for “hospitalized”, in the fourth sentence, substituted “, loss of an eye, or amputation” for “of one or more employees” preceding “eight or more hours”; substituted “not later than” for “within” in two places; deleted “of the fatality or in-patient hospitalization” near the end, and, in the fourth sentence, inserted “, loss of an eye, or amputation” preceding “more than 30 days”; made related and stylistic changes.

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 9, SLA 2016 makes this section effective May 23, 2016, in accordance with AS

01.10.070

(c).

Sec. 18.60.059.
Legal counsel.

The attorney general is legal counsel for the OSHA Review Board. The attorney general shall advise the board on legal matters arising in the discharge of its duties and represent the board in actions to which it is a party. If, in the opinion of the board, the public interest is not adequately represented by counsel in a proceeding, the attorney general, upon request of the board, shall represent the public interest.

Subject to the approval of the attorney general, the board may employ temporary legal counsel from time to time in matters in which the board is involved.

History.

(§ 4 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Sec. 18.60.060.
Cooperation by other state agencies.

The agencies of the state shall cooperate with the department in its program of safety activities and shall make available information needed by the department relative to the accident problems and methods employed or recommended for accident prevention.
The agencies may lend the personnel who may be spared from their regular duties for short periods to assist in safety programs.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.60.065.
Importation of toxic and hazardous substances.

Toxic and hazardous substances imported into the state shall be accompanied by a federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) form 20 or equivalent information.
This requirement does not apply to a substance for which the in-state purchaser has already received the most current information.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1983)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Cosmetic products, when used by employees in a commercial establishment, do not fall within the exemption for products intended for personal consumption under AS

18.60.105(a)(9)(B)

[now (a)(10)(B)]; therefore, this section requires that material safety data sheets be provided for cosmetics to be used in commercial establishments.
November 1, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Neither the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq. nor the federal hazard communication standard, 29 C.F.R. § 1910.1200, preempts Alaska’s enforcement of its right-to-know law or hazard communication standard. March 20, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.60.066.
Employee safety education programs.

An employer shall conduct a safety education program for an employee before the employee performs a new work assignment that may result in the employee being exposed to a toxic or hazardous substance or a physical agent for which the employee has not received safety instruction as provided under (b) of this section.

An employee safety instruction program shall inform the employee of

the location, properties, and known or suspected acute and chronic health effects of the hazardous or toxic substances or physical agents to which the employee is exposed in the workplace;

the nature of the operations that could result in exposure to hazardous or toxic substances or physical agents as well as any necessary handling or hygienic practices or precautions; and

the location, purpose, proper use, and limitations of personal protective equipment used in the workplace.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 1987)

Sec. 18.60.067.
Information provided on employee’s request.

An employer shall make available to an employee on request a copy of the most recent OSHA form 20 or equivalent written information for a toxic or hazardous substance or for a physical agent to which the employee may be exposed. If the employer does not have the copy or information requested, the employer shall request a copy from the department or the manufacturer of the substance within three state government working days after receiving the request.

If the copy or information requested under (a) of this section is not made available to the employee within 15 calendar days after the request is received, the employer shall take measures to assure that employees are not exposed to the substance to which the copy or information pertains until the copy or information is made available to the employee who made the request. This subsection applies only to substances for which an OSHA form 20 or equivalent information is required under OSHA regulations. This subsection does not alter, deny, or abrogate any right an employee may have under law to refuse to work under hazardous circumstances.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 1987)

Sec. 18.60.068.
Posting of information in workplace.

The department shall print and make available to employers posters that contain notice of the provisions of this chapter relating to toxic and hazardous substances and physical agents.

An employer whose employees are or may be exposed in the workplace to a toxic or hazardous substance or a physical agent shall display the following information in a manner designed to notify the employees:

a poster printed by the department under (a) of this section; and

an OSHA form 20 or equivalent information for each toxic or hazardous substance and for each physical agent to which an employee may be exposed in the workplace

under normal conditions of work; or

during a reasonably foreseeable emergency, including equipment failure and rupture of containers.

Instead of posting the information required under (b)(2) of this section, an employer may post a list of the chemical name and product name of each toxic or hazardous substance and each physical agent to which an employee may be exposed in the workplace, together with an identification of a location, in or near the workplace and accessible to employees, where an employee may inspect the information listed under (b)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 35 SLA 1987)

Sec. 18.60.070.
Use of funds and contributions.

Funds appropriated by the legislature for AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

and contributions shall be spent only for the purposes of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 109 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 148 SLA 1957; am § ch 37 SLA 1986)

Sec. 18.60.075.
Safe employment.

An employer shall do everything necessary to protect the life, health, and safety of employees, including

complying with all occupational safety and health standards and regulations adopted by the department;

furnishing and prescribing the use of suitable protective equipment, safety devices, and safeguards as are prescribed for the work and workplace;

adopting and prescribing control or technological procedures, and monitoring and measuring employee exposure in connection with hazards, as may be necessary for the protection of employees; and

furnishing to each employee employment and a place of employment that are free from recognized hazards that, in the opinion of the commissioner, are causing or are likely to cause death or serious physical harm to the employees.

An employee shall comply with occupational safety and health standards and all regulations issued under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

that are applicable to the employee’s own actions and conduct.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 72 SLA 1973.]

History.

(§ 43-2-21 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 148 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1970; am §§ 5, 6, 9 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 4 ch 276 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

For occupational safety and health standards, see 8 AAC 61, art. 11.

For building safety regulations, see 8 AAC 75.

Sec. 18.60.077.
Variance from a standard.

An employer who is affected by AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

may apply to the commissioner for a variance from a provision of the safety and health standards adopted by the department. Employees who are affected by an application for variance shall be given notice of the application for variance and an opportunity to participate in the hearing. The commissioner shall issue the variance if the commissioner determines on the basis of the hearing record, after opportunity for an inspection where appropriate, that the proponent of the variance has demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that the conditions, practices, means, methods, operations, or processes used or proposed to be used by an employer will provide employment and places of employment to employees that are as safe and as healthful as those that would prevail if the employer complied with the provisions of the safety and health standards adopted by the department. The variance shall prescribe the conditions the employer must maintain and the practices, means, methods, operations, and processes that the employer must adopt and utilize to the extent they differ from the standard in question. The variance may be modified or revoked upon application by an employer, by employees, or by motion of the commissioner, in the manner prescribed for its issuance under this subsection at any time after six months from its issuance.

When the commissioner grants a variance, the commissioner shall include in this grant a statement of the reasons for the action, and the statement shall be published in a newspaper of statewide circulation and in a newspaper of local circulation in the area where the variance will be implemented. A copy of the statement shall be sent to the OSHA Review Board.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For variances, see 8 AAC 61, art. 5.

Sec. 18.60.080.
Contributions.

The department may accept contributions of funds, property, materials, supplies, and other forms of aid from business firms, organized groups, or individuals for furthering the safety program.

History.

(§ 10 ch 109 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.60.081.
Temporary variance.

An employer who is affected by AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

may apply to the commissioner for a temporary variance from a provision of the safety and health standards adopted by the department. A temporary variance shall be issued only if the employer files an application fulfilling the requirements of (b) of this section and the employer establishes that the employer

is unable to comply with a standard by its effective date because of unavailability of the professional or technical personnel or of the materials and equipment needed to come into compliance or because necessary construction or alteration of facilities cannot be completed by the effective date;

is taking all available steps to safeguard employees against the hazards covered by the standard;

has an effective program for coming into compliance with the standards as quickly as practicable.

An application for a temporary variance must contain

a specification of the standard from which the employer seeks a temporary variance;

a representation by the employer, supported by representations from qualified persons having firsthand knowledge of the facts represented, that the employer is unable to comply and a detailed statement of the reasons for this inability;

a statement of the steps the employer has taken and will take, including specific dates, to protect employees against the hazard covered by the standard;

a statement of when the employer expects to be able to comply with the standard and what steps the employer has taken and what steps the employer will take, including specific dates, to come into compliance;

a certification that the employer has informed employees of the application for temporary variance and of their right to request a hearing by giving a copy of the application and a written statement of the right to a hearing to the employees’ authorized representative, by posting a statement giving a summary of the application and stating the employees’ right to a hearing and specifying where a copy of the application and notice of right to a hearing may be examined at the place or places where notices to employees are normally posted, and by other appropriate means.

A temporary variance issued under this section must prescribe the practices, means, methods, operations, and processes that the employer shall adopt and use while the variance is in effect and state in detail the employer’s program for coming into compliance with the standard. A temporary variance may be granted only after notice to affected employees and an opportunity for hearing. However, the commissioner may issue one interim order to be effective until a decision is made on the basis of a hearing. A temporary variance may not be in effect for longer than the period needed by the employer to achieve compliance with the standard or one year, whichever is shorter, except that a temporary variance may be renewed no more than twice if the requirements of (a) and (b) of this section are met and the application for renewal is filed at least 90 days before the expiration date of the variance. An interim renewal of an order may not remain in effect for longer than 180 days.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For variances, see 8 AAC 61, art. 5.

Sec. 18.60.083.
Right of entry and inspection.

A representative of the department, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, may

enter without delay and at reasonable times a factory, plant, establishment, construction site, or other area, work place, or environment where work is performed by an employee of an employer; and

inspect and investigate during regular working hours and at other reasonable times, and with reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, a place of employment and all pertinent conditions, structures, machines, devices, equipment, and materials, and question privately an employer, owner, operator, agent, or employee.

In making inspections and investigations under (a) of this section, the department may issue subpoenas compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers and records. Witnesses shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnesses in the courts of the state. If a person fails to grant a right of entry and inspection, the department may seek an order from the superior court compelling the person to submit to entry and inspection. If a person fails to comply with a subpoena or a witness refuses to testify to a matter regarding which the witness may be lawfully interrogated, a superior court may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from the court or a refusal to testify before it.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Sec. 18.60.085.
Prohibition of unauthorized notice of inspection.

A person may not give unauthorized notice of a department safety or health inspection. A person who gives unauthorized notice of a safety or health inspection, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $7,000, or by imprisonment for not more than 180 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 116 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Sec. 18.60.087.
Employer and employee participation in inspections.

A representative of the employer and a representative authorized by the employees shall be given an opportunity to accompany the representative of the department during the physical inspection of a work place for the purpose of aiding the inspection. If the authorized representative is an employee, time spent aiding the inspection shall be considered as time worked and the employee shall be compensated accordingly. When there is no authorized employee representative, there shall be consultation with a reasonable number of employees concerning matters of health and safety in the work place.

Comments relating to an employer’s compliance with the provisions of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

made by an employee or an employee representative to the representative of the department during the course of an inspection, and the name of any employee or employee representative making these comments to a representative of the department, are confidential and may not be made available by the department to the employer without the consent of the employee or the employee representative.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 5 ch 276 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Sec. 18.60.088.
Employee requests for special inspection.

An employee or a representative of employees who believes that a violation of a safety or health standard exists that threatens physical harm or that an imminent danger exists may request an inspection by giving notice of the violation or danger to the department. The notice must be in writing and set out with reasonable particularity the grounds for the notice and be signed by the employee or the representative of the employees. If, upon receipt of the notice, the department determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that a violation or danger exists, the department shall make a special inspection as soon as practicable. If the department determines there are no reasonable grounds to believe that a violation exists, the department shall notify in writing the employee or the representative of the employees of that determination.

If the department makes a special inspection, or an inspection under AS

18.60.083

, a copy of an employee notice shall be provided the employer no later than at the time of the inspection. Unless expressly consented to by the person giving the notice, the person’s name and the name of employees referred to in the notice shall be kept confidential and may not appear in the copy provided the employer or in any record available to the employer.

The department shall furnish the notifying person a written explanation of why a citation was not issued after a special inspection.

The department shall, by regulation, establish a review procedure for a failure to issue a citation after a special inspection and shall provide the employees requesting a review a written statement of the final disposition of the case.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 6 ch 276 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Sec. 18.60.089.
Prohibition against retribution.

A person may not discharge or discriminate against an employee because the employee has filed a complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted a proceeding related to the enforcement of occupational safety and health standards, or has testified or is expected to testify in a proceeding relating to occupational safety and health or because an employee has exercised personally or on behalf of others a right afforded under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

.

An employee who has been discharged or discriminated against by a person in violation of this section may, within 30 days after the violation occurs, file a complaint with the commissioner alleging the discrimination. Upon receipt of the complaint, the commissioner shall investigate the matter as the commissioner considers appropriate. If, upon investigation, the commissioner determines that this section has been violated, the commissioner shall request the attorney general to bring an action in the superior court against the violator. The superior court has jurisdiction to restrain violations of (a) of this section and to order all appropriate relief, including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee to the employee’s former position with back pay.

Within 90 days of the receipt of a complaint filed under this section, the commissioner shall notify the complainant of the determination under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For discrimination, see 8 AAC 61, art. 7.

Sec. 18.60.090.
Penalty for violations.
[Repealed, § 9 ch 72 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 18.60.091.
Citations.

If, upon inspection or investigation, the department believes that an employer has violated a provision of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

that is applicable to the employer, the department shall with reasonable promptness issue a citation to the employer. Each citation shall be in writing and must describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including reference to the provisions of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

or any order or regulation alleged to have been violated, and must fix a reasonable time for abatement of the violation. The department may prescribe procedures for the issuance of a notice instead of a citation with respect to minor violations that have no direct or immediate relationship to safety or health, or violations that are not serious and that the employer agrees to correct within a reasonable time. If an employer does not, within a reasonable time set out in the notice, correct a violation that is not serious, the department shall issue a citation to the employer.

Upon receipt by the employer, each citation issued under this section, or a copy of the citation, shall be immediately and prominently posted, at or near each place the violation referred to in the citation occurred.

A citation may not be issued for a particular violation under this section after the expiration of 180 days following the discovery of the violation by the department or correction of a violation.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1983)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.